Illinois, session 104th, SB237.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Community-Based Corrections Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to create a 7transformative post-conviction model that reduces reliance on 8traditional incarceration for emerging adults by fostering 9partnerships between the Department of Corrections, the 10Department of Human Services, and nonprofit, community-based 11providers to implement restorative justice, workforce 12training, and mental health support. 13    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:14    "Community-based provider" means a nonprofit organization 15that provides residential and rehabilitative services to 16emerging adults. 17    "Emerging adult" means an individual who is at least 18 18years of age but under 26 years of age who has been convicted 19of a crime that is eligible for confinement in a penal 20institution. 21    "Penal institution" has the meaning ascribed to the term 22in Section 2-14 of the Criminal Code of 2012.  SB0237- 2 -LRB104 03576 RLC 13600 b1    "Restorative justice court" means a judicial body 2facilitating community-based resolutions to address harm 3caused by offenders and promote rehabilitation. 4    Section 15. Establishment of community-based corrections. 5    (a) The Department of Corrections shall establish a 6program that funds community-based nonprofit providers to 7serve emerging adults as an alternative to traditional 8incarceration.9    (b) Community-based providers shall offer housing, 10workforce training, mental health counseling, and restorative 11justice programming in alignment with State guidelines.12    (c) The program shall be subject to judicial discretion, 13allowing sentencing judges to assign eligible individuals to 14community-based settings instead of Department of Corrections 15facilities. All community-based providers must have a written 16agreement with a restorative justice court for all emerging 17adults within their care to participate in the restorative 18justice court programs.19    (d) The Department of Human Services shall approve 20community-based providers as eligible to participate in the 21program, based on their ability to deliver high-quality 22programming consistent with Department of Human Services 23mandates. 24    Section 20. Funding and payment structure.   SB0237- 3 -LRB104 03576 RLC 13600 b1    (a) Community-based providers shall be compensated at a 2rate equivalent to the monthly per-inmate cost of 3incarceration as determined by the Department of Corrections 4in its Fiscal Impact Statement. Community-based providers 5shall be paid on a monthly basis for the number of individuals 6within their care.7    (b) The Department of Corrections shall allocate existing 8budget authority for contractual services to fund the program 9created by this Act. 10    Section 25. Standards and oversight. 11    (a) The Department of Human Services shall establish 12operational standards, including housing conditions, workforce 13training quality, and mental health support services, to 14ensure program efficacy.15    (b) The Department of Human Services shall monitor and 16evaluate providers to maintain compliance with State and 17judicial requirements. 18    Section 30. Reporting and accountability. 19    (a) Community-based providers shall submit annual reports 20to the Department of Corrections and the Department of Human 21Services detailing participant outcomes, including recidivism 22rates, employment statistics, and community reintegration 23success.24    (b) The Department of Corrections shall report program   SB0237- 4 -LRB104 03576 RLC 13600 b1performance to the General Assembly annually, including cost 2savings from reduced incarceration based on emerging adults 3participating with community-based providers for fewer years 4than they would serve in a Department of Corrections facility. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.